Utah statutes.
58-60-115.2.   Pre-existing license by endorsement.

A person who, on May 11, 2010, has a valid license by endorsement under Section 58-60-115 that was granted before May 11, 2010, is considered to have met the requirements of Subsection 58-60-115(4) if the person provides documentation that the person has engaged in:

(1)  the lawful practice of the person's profession, including mental health therapy, for not less than 4,000 hours during the three years immediately preceding the date of application for licensure in Utah; or

(2)  the lawful practice of the profession for which licensure is sought for not less than 4,000 hours, of which 1,000 hours are in mental health therapy.



Enacted by Chapter 214, 2010 General Session

